District of Columbia statutes.
1-1102.11

Repealed

Candidate’s liability for financial obligation incurred by political committee.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 454, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 211
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1421.
1973 Ed., § 1-1141.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).